Hawaii statutes.
[§414D-35] Organization of corporation.
(a) After incorporation:

(1) If initial directors are named in the articles of
incorporation, the initial directors shall hold an organizational meeting, at
the call of a majority of the directors, to complete the organization of the
corporation by appointing officers, adopting bylaws, and carrying on any other
business brought before the meeting;

(2) If initial directors are not named in the
articles, the incorporator or incorporators shall hold an organizational
meeting at the call of a majority of the incorporators to elect:

(A) Directors and complete the organization
of the corporation; or

(B) A board of directors who shall complete
the organization of the corporation.

(b) Action required or permitted by this
chapter to be taken by incorporators at an organizational meeting may be taken
without a meeting if the action taken is evidenced by one or more written
consents describing the action taken and signed by each incorporator.

(c) An organizational meeting may be held in
or out of the State in accordance with section 414D-143. [L 2001, c 105, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next